Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.220

Beneficiary trustee—Inferences of law—Judicial review.

RCW 11.98.200 through 11.98.240 do not raise any inference that the law of this state prior to July 25, 1993, was different than under RCW 11.98.200 through 11.98.240. Further, RCW 11.98.200 through 11.98.240 do not raise an inference that prior to July 25, 1993, a trustee's exercise or failure to exercise a power described in RCW 11.98.200 through 11.98.240 was not subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction for abuse of discretion or breach of fiduciary duty under chapter 11.96A RCW or other applicable law. Following July 25, 1993, the power of judicial review continues to apply.

[ 1999 c 42 s 625; 1993 c 339 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Severability—1993 c 339: See note following RCW 11.98.200.